Washington statutes.
RCW 43.103.050

Terms of members—Vacancies.

All members of the council are appointed for terms of four years, commencing on July 1 and expiring on June 30. However, of the members appointed to the council, five shall be appointed for two-year terms and six shall be appointed for four-year terms. A person chosen to fill a vacancy created other than by the natural expiration of a member's term shall be nominated and appointed as provided in RCW 43.103.040 for the unexpired term of the member he or she is to succeed. Any member may be reappointed for additional terms.

[ 1995 c 398 s 6; 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 5.]